Illinois, session 104th, SB4186.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The amount of $16,500,000, or so much of that 5    amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build 6    Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7    Opportunity for a grant to Iroquois County Community Unit 8    School District #9 for costs associated with facility 9    additions and upgrades. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.